Ohio, session 136, HB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4501.21 be amended and section 4
4503.889 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 4501.21. (A) There is hereby created in the state 6
treasury the license plate contribution fund. The fund shall 7
consist of all contributions for specialty license plates paid 8
by motor vehicle registrants and collected by the registrar of 9
motor vehicles pursuant to the Revised Code sections referenced 10
in division (B) of this section. 11
(B) The registrar shall pay the contributions the 12
registrar collects in the fund as follows: 13
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 14
pursuant to section 4503.491 of the Revised Code to the breast 15
cancer fund of Ohio, which shall use that money only to pay for 16
programs that provide assistance and education to Ohio breast 17
cancer patients and that improve access for such patients to 18
quality health care and clinical trials and shall not use any of 19
the money for abortion information, counseling, services, or 20

H. B. No. 310 Page 2
As Introduced
other abortion-related activities. 21
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 22
receives pursuant to section 4503.492 of the Revised Code to the 23
organization cancer support community central Ohio, which shall 24
deposit the money into the Sheryl L. Kraner Fund of that 25
organization. Cancer support community central Ohio shall expend 26
the money it receives pursuant to this division only in the same 27
manner and for the same purposes as that organization expends 28
other money in that fund. 29
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 30
pursuant to section 4503.493 of the Revised Code to the autism 31
society of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for programs 32
and autism awareness efforts throughout the state. 33
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 34
receives pursuant to section 4503.494 of the Revised Code to the 35
national multiple sclerosis society for distribution in equal 36
amounts to the northwestern Ohio, Ohio buckeye, and Ohio valley 37
chapters of the national multiple sclerosis society. These 38
chapters shall use the money they receive under this section to 39
assist in paying the expenses they incur in providing services 40
directly to their clients. 41
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 42
receives pursuant to section 4503.495 of the Revised Code to the 43
national pancreatic cancer foundation, which shall use the money 44
it receives under this section to assist those who have 45
pancreatic cancer and their families. 46
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 47
receives pursuant to section 4503.496 of the Revised Code to the 48
Ohio sickle cell and health association, which shall use the 49

H. B. No. 310 Page 3
As Introduced
contributions to help support educational, clinical, and social 50
support services for adults who have sickle cell disease. 51
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 52
receives pursuant to section 4503.497 of the Revised Code to the 53
St. Baldrick's foundation, which shall use the contributions for 54
its research and other programs. 55
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 56
receives pursuant to section 4503.498 of the Revised Code to 57
special olympics Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions 58
for its programs, charitable efforts, and other activities. 59
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 60
receives pursuant to section 4503.499 of the Revised Code to the 61
children's glioma cancer foundation, which shall use the 62
contributions for its research and other programs. 63
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 64
receives pursuant to section 4503.4910 of the Revised Code to 65
the KylerStrong foundation, which shall use the contributions to 66
raise awareness of brain cancer caused by diffuse intrinsic 67
pontine glioma and to fund research for the cure of such cancer. 68
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 69
receives pursuant to section 4503.4911 of the Revised Code to 70
the research institution for childhood cancer at nationwide 71
children's hospital, which shall use the contributions to fund 72
research for the cure of childhood cancers. 73
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 74
receives pursuant to section 4503.4912 of the Revised Code to 75
the Ben Morrison memorial fund, which shall use the 76
contributions for scholarships and other programs that support 77
mental health. 78

H. B. No. 310 Page 4
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 79
receives pursuant to section 4503.50 of the Revised Code to the 80
future farmers of America foundation, which shall deposit the 81
contributions into its general account to be used for 82
educational and scholarship purposes of the future farmers of 83
America foundation. 84
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 85
receives pursuant to section 4503.501 of the Revised Code to the 86
4-H youth development program of the Ohio state university 87
extension program, which shall use those contributions to pay 88
the expenses it incurs in conducting its educational activities. 89
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 90
pursuant to section 4503.502 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 91
cattlemen's foundation, which shall use those contributions for 92
scholarships and other educational activities. 93
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 94
pursuant to section 4503.505 of the Revised Code to the 95
organization Ohio region phi theta kappa, which shall use those 96
contributions for scholarships for students who are members of 97
that organization. 98
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 99
receives pursuant to section 4503.506 of the Revised Code to 100
Ohio demolay, which shall use the contributions for 101
scholarships, educational programs, and any other programs or 102
events the organization holds or sponsors in this state. 103
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 104
pursuant to section 4503.507 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 105
aerospace institute, which shall use those contributions to 106
facilitate student internships in aerospace and educational 107

H. B. No. 310 Page 5
As Introduced
programming. 108
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 109
pursuant to section 4503.508 of the Revised Code to the 110
organization bottoms up diaper drive to provide funding for that 111
organization for collecting and delivering diapers to parents in 112
need. 113
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 114
receives pursuant to section 4503.509 of the Revised Code to a 115
kid again, incorporated for distribution in equal amounts to the 116
Ohio chapters of a kid again. 117
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 118
receives pursuant to section 4503.51 of the Revised Code to the 119
university or college whose name or marking or design appears on 120
collegiate license plates that are issued to a person under that 121
section. A university or college that receives contributions 122
from the fund shall deposit the contributions into its general 123
scholarship fund. 124
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 125
receives pursuant to section 4503.512 of the Revised Code to the 126
Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated Delta Theta Omega 127
chapter in Ohio. The Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated 128
Delta Theta Omega chapter shall use the contributions for the 129
development and perpetuation of scholarship, leadership, 130
citizenship, fidelity, and brotherhood among men and youth in 131
this state. 132
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 133
receives pursuant to section 4503.514 of the Revised Code to the 134
university of Notre Dame in South Bend, Indiana, for purposes of 135
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 136

H. B. No. 310 Page 6
As Introduced
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 137
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 138
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the 139
university of Notre Dame to effectuate the distribution of such 140
funds as provided in this section. 141
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 142
receives pursuant to section 4503.516 of the Revised Code to 143
Marshall university in Huntington, West Virginia, for purposes 144
of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who 145
attend the university. The university shall not use any of the 146
funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship 147
program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements 148
with Marshall university to effectuate the distribution of such 149
funds as provided in this section. 150
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 151
receives pursuant to section 4503.517 of the Revised Code to the 152
university of Alabama in Tuscaloosa, Alabama, for purposes of 153
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 154
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 155
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 156
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the 157
university of Alabama to effectuate the distribution of such 158
funds as provided in this section. 159
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 160
receives pursuant to section 4503.518 of the Revised Code to the 161
Nationwide children's hospital, which shall use the 162
contributions for the "On Our Sleeves" campaign. 163
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 164
receives pursuant to section 4503.519 of the Revised Code 165
equally to NAMI Ohio (national alliance on mental illness of 166

H. B. No. 310 Page 7
As Introduced
Ohio), Ohio peer recovery organizations, and OCAAR (Ohio citizen 167
advocates for addiction recovery). 168
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 169
receives pursuant to section 4503.520 of the Revised Code to 170
Purdue university in West Lafayette, Indiana, for purposes of 171
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 172
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 173
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 174
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with 175
Purdue university to effectuate the distribution of such funds 176
as provided in this section. 177
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 178
receives pursuant to section 4503.521 of the Revised Code to the 179
Ohio bicycle federation to assist that organization in paying 180
for the educational programs it sponsors in support of Ohio 181
cyclists of all ages. 182
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 183
receives pursuant to section 4503.522 of the Revised Code to the 184
"friends of Perry's victory and international peace memorial, 185
incorporated," a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws 186
of this state, to assist that organization in paying the 187
expenses it incurs in sponsoring or holding charitable, 188
educational, and cultural events at the monument. 189
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 190
receives pursuant to section 4503.523 of the Revised Code to the 191
fairport lights foundation, which shall use the money to pay for 192
the restoration, maintenance, and preservation of the 193
lighthouses of fairport harbor. 194
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 195

H. B. No. 310 Page 8
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.524 of the Revised Code to the 196
Massillon tiger football booster club, which shall use the 197
contributions only to promote and support the football team of 198
Washington high school of the Massillon city school district. 199
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 200
receives pursuant to section 4503.525 of the Revised Code to the 201
United States power squadron district seven which shall annually 202
distribute the contributions in equal amounts to all United 203
States power squadrons located in the state. Each power squadron 204
district shall use the money it receives under this section to 205
pay for the educational boating programs each district holds or 206
sponsors within this state. 207
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 208
receives pursuant to section 4503.526 of the Revised Code to the 209
Ohio district Kiwanis foundation of the Ohio district of Kiwanis 210
international, which shall use the money it receives under this 211
section to pay the costs of its educational and humanitarian 212
activities. 213
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 214
receives pursuant to section 4503.528 of the Revised Code to the 215
Ohio children's alliance, which shall use the money it receives 216
under this section to pay the expenses it incurs in advancing 217
its mission of sustainably improving the provision of services 218
to children, young adults, and families in this state. 219
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 220
receives pursuant to section 4503.529 of the Revised Code to the 221
Ohio nurses foundation. The foundation shall use the money it 222
receives under this section to provide educational scholarships 223
to assist individuals who aspire to join the nursing profession, 224
to assist nurses in the nursing profession who seek to advance 225

H. B. No. 310 Page 9
As Introduced
their education, and to support persons conducting nursing 226
research concerning the evidence-based practice of nursing and 227
the improvement of patient outcomes. 228
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 229
receives pursuant to section 4503.53 of the Revised Code to the 230
Indiana Kentucky Ohio regional council of carpenters. The 231
council shall use the money it receives to assist its members 232
who are experiencing financial hardship. 233
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 234
receives pursuant to section 4503.531 of the Revised Code to the 235
thank you foundation, incorporated, a nonprofit corporation 236
organized under the laws of this state, to assist that 237
organization in paying for the charitable activities and 238
programs it sponsors in support of United States military 239
personnel, veterans, and their families. 240
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 241
receives pursuant to section 4503.532 of the Revised Code to the 242
Ohio history connection, which shall use the contributions for 243
the benefit of the Paul Laurence Dunbar house. 244
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 245
receives pursuant to section 4503.533 of the Revised Code to the 246
nonprofit organization Ohio conference of teamsters and industry 247
health and welfare fund, which shall use the contributions to 248
further the nonprofit's mission. 249
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 250
receives pursuant to section 4503.534 of the Revised Code to the 251
disabled American veterans department of Ohio, to be used for 252
programs that serve disabled American veterans and their 253
families. 254

H. B. No. 310 Page 10
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 255
receives pursuant to section 4503.536 of the Revised Code to 256
save a warrior, incorporated, which shall use the contributions 257
to prevent suicide by active members of the armed forces of the 258
United States, veterans of those armed forces, and first 259
responders. 260
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 261
receives pursuant to section 4503.542 of the Revised Code to the 262
Ohio craft brewers association. 263
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 264
receives pursuant to section 4503.541 of the Revised Code to 265
Dolly Parton's imagination library of Ohio. The library shall 266
use the money it receives under this section for operational 267
costs, including the distribution of books. 268
The registrar shall pay the contributions that are paid to 269
the registrar pursuant to section 4503.545 of the Revised Code 270
to the national rifle association foundation, which shall use 271
the money to pay the costs of the educational activities and 272
programs the foundation holds or sponsors in this state. 273
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 274
receives pursuant to section 4503.55 of the Revised Code to the 275
pro football hall of fame, which shall deposit the contributions 276
into a special bank account that it establishes and which shall 277
be separate and distinct from any other account the pro football 278
hall of fame maintains, to be used exclusively for the purpose 279
of promoting the pro football hall of fame as a travel 280
destination. 281
The registrar shall pay to the Ohio pet fund the 282
contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 283

H. B. No. 310 Page 11
As Introduced
4503.551 of the Revised Code and any other money from any other 284
source, including donations, gifts, and grants, that is 285
designated by the source to be paid to the Ohio pet fund. The 286
Ohio pet fund shall use the moneys it receives under this 287
section to support programs for the sterilization of dogs and 288
cats and for educational programs concerning the proper 289
veterinary care of those animals, and for expenses of the Ohio 290
pet fund that are reasonably necessary for it to obtain and 291
maintain its tax-exempt status and to perform its duties. 292
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 293
receives pursuant to section 4503.552 of the Revised Code to the 294
rock and roll hall of fame and museum, incorporated. 295
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 296
receives pursuant to section 4503.553 of the Revised Code to the 297
Ohio coalition for animals, incorporated, a nonprofit 298
corporation. Except as provided in division (B) of this section, 299
the coalition shall distribute the money to its members, and the 300
members shall use the money only to pay for educational, 301
charitable, and other programs of each coalition member that 302
provide care for unwanted, abused, and neglected horses. The 303
Ohio coalition for animals may use a portion of the money to pay 304
for reasonable marketing costs incurred in the design and 305
promotion of the license plate and for administrative costs 306
incurred in the disbursement and management of funds received 307
under this section. 308
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 309
receives pursuant to section 4503.554 of the Revised Code to the 310
Ohio state council of the knights of Columbus, which shall use 311
the contributions to pay for its charitable activities and 312
programs. 313

H. B. No. 310 Page 12
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 314
receives pursuant to section 4503.555 of the Revised Code to the 315
western reserve historical society, which shall use the 316
contributions to fund the Crawford auto aviation museum. 317
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 318
receives pursuant to section 4503.556 of the Revised Code to the 319
Erica J. Holloman foundation, inc., for the awareness of triple 320
negative breast cancer. The foundation shall use the 321
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 322
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 323
receives pursuant to section 4503.557 of the Revised Code to the 324
central Ohio chapter of the Ronald McDonald house charities, 325
which shall distribute the contribution to the chapter of the 326
Ronald McDonald house charities in whose geographic territory 327
the person who paid the contribution resides. 328
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 329
receives pursuant to section 4503.559 of the Revised Code to 330
playhouse square, located in Cleveland, Ohio, which shall use 331
the contributions to further its mission of presenting and 332
producing a wide variety of quality performing arts, advancing 333
arts education, and creating a superior destination for 334
entertainment, business, and residential living. 335
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 336
receives pursuant to section 4503.561 of the Revised Code to the 337
state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., which shall 338
deposit the contributions into a special bank account that it 339
establishes. The special bank account shall be separate and 340
distinct from any other account the state of Ohio chapter of 341
ducks unlimited, inc., maintains and shall be used exclusively 342
for the purpose of protecting, enhancing, restoring, and 343

H. B. No. 310 Page 13
As Introduced
managing wetlands and conserving wildlife habitat. The state of 344
Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., annually shall notify the 345
registrar in writing of the name, address, and account to which 346
such payments are to be made. 347
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 348
receives pursuant to section 4503.562 of the Revised Code to the 349
Mahoning river consortium, which shall use the money to pay the 350
expenses it incurs in restoring and maintaining the Mahoning 351
river watershed. 352
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 353
receives pursuant to section 4503.564 of the Revised Code to the 354
Glen Helen association to pay expenses related to the Glen Helen 355
nature preserve. 356
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 357
receives pursuant to section 4503.565 of the Revised Code to the 358
conservancy for Cuyahoga valley national park, which shall use 359
the money in support of the park. 360
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 361
receives pursuant to section 4503.566 of the Revised Code to the 362
Ottawa national wildlife refuge, which shall use the 363
contributions for wildlife preservation purposes. 364
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 365
receives pursuant to section 4503.567 of the Revised Code to the 366
girls on the run of Franklin county, inc., which shall use the 367
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 368
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 369
receives pursuant to section 4503.569 of the Revised Code to the 370
Ohio bird sanctuary, located in Mansfield, Ohio, which shall use 371
the contributions for purposes of its operations, bird care and 372

H. B. No. 310 Page 14
As Introduced
rehabilitation, and educational programs. 373
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 374
receives pursuant to section 4503.576 of the Revised Code to the 375
Ohio state beekeepers association, which shall use those 376
contributions to promote beekeeping, provide educational 377
information about beekeeping, and to support other state and 378
local beekeeping programs. 379
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 380
receives pursuant to section 4503.577 of the Revised Code to the 381
national aviation hall of fame, which shall use the 382
contributions to fulfill its mission of honoring aerospace 383
legends to inspire future leaders. 384
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 385
receives pursuant to section 4503.578 of the Revised Code to 386
keep Ohio beautiful, incorporated, which shall use the 387
contributions towards its mission of empowering Ohio communities 388
to take greater responsibility for improving the local 389
environment through litter prevention, beautification, community 390
greening, waste reduction, and recycling. 391
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 392
receives pursuant to section 4503.579 of the Revised Code to the 393
national council of negro women, incorporated, which shall use 394
the contributions for educational purposes. 395
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 396
receives pursuant to section 4503.581 of the Revised Code to the 397
Ohio past detachment commander's club, inc., which shall use the 398
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 399
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 400
receives pursuant to section 4503.582 of the Revised Code to the 401

H. B. No. 310 Page 15
As Introduced
progressive animal welfare society adoption center, inc., which 402
shall use the contributions to support the activities of the 403
center. 404
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 405
receives pursuant to section 4503.583 of the Revised Code to the 406
American legion, department of Ohio, inc., which shall use the 407
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 408
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 409
receives pursuant to section 4503.584 of the Revised Code to the 410
Ohio natural energy foundation to fund scholarships for students 411
pursuing careers in the oil and natural gas industry. 412
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 413
receives pursuant to section 4503.585 of the Revised Code to the 414
Terrace Park recreation committee, inc. to offer scholarships to 415
young athletes of, and maintain athletic facilities in, the 416
municipal corporation of Terrace Park. 417
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 418
receives pursuant to section 4503.586 of the Revised Code to the 419
Ohio mountain bike alliance. 420
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 421
receives pursuant to section 4503.588 of the Revised Code to the 422
Ohio grange patrons of husbandry foundation, which shall use the 423
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 424
The registrar shall pay to a sports commission created 425
pursuant to section 4503.591 of the Revised Code each 426
contribution the registrar receives under that section that an 427
applicant pays to obtain license plates that bear the logo of a 428
professional sports team located in the county of that sports 429
commission and that is participating in the license plate 430

H. B. No. 310 Page 16
As Introduced
program pursuant to division (E) of that section, irrespective 431
of the county of residence of an applicant. 432
The registrar shall pay to a community charity each 433
contribution the registrar receives under section 4503.591 of 434
the Revised Code that an applicant pays to obtain license plates 435
that bear the logo of a professional sports team that is 436
participating in the license plate program pursuant to division 437
(G) of that section. 438
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 439
receives pursuant to section 4503.592 of the Revised Code to 440
pollinator partnership's monarch wings across Ohio program, 441
which shall use the contributions for the protection and 442
preservation of the monarch butterfly and pollinator corridor in 443
Ohio and for educational programs. 444
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 445
receives pursuant to section 4503.594 of the Revised Code to 446
pelotonia, which shall use the contributions for the purpose of 447
supporting cancer research. 448
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 449
receives pursuant to section 4503.595 of the Revised Code to the 450
Stan Hywet hall and gardens. 451
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 452
receives pursuant to section 4503.596 of the Revised Code to the 453
Cuyahoga valley scenic railroad. 454
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 455
receives pursuant to section 4503.597 of the Revised Code to the 456
Circleville pumpkin show, incorporated, which shall use the 457
contributions to promote good will surrounding the Circleville 458
pumpkin show as a nonprofit annual event. 459

H. B. No. 310 Page 17
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 460
receives pursuant to section 4503.598 of the Revised Code 461
equally to the Jackson local schools foundation and the Jackson 462
high school alumni association. The foundation and alumni 463
association shall use the contributions for the foundation's and 464
alumni association's purposes. 465
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 466
receives pursuant to section 4503.67 of the Revised Code to the 467
Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council 468
shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner 469
throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. 470
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 471
receives pursuant to section 4503.68 of the Revised Code to the 472
girl scouts of Ohio's heartland. The girl scouts of Ohio's 473
heartland shall distribute all contributions in an equitable 474
manner throughout the state to regional councils of the girl 475
scouts. 476
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 477
receives pursuant to section 4503.69 of the Revised Code to the 478
Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council 479
shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner 480
throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. 481
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 482
receives pursuant to section 4503.70 of the Revised Code to the 483
charitable foundation of the grand lodge of Ohio, f. & a. m., 484
which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. 485
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 486
receives pursuant to section 4503.701 of the Revised Code to the 487
Prince Hall grand lodge of free and accepted masons of Ohio, 488

H. B. No. 310 Page 18
As Introduced
which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. 489
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 490
receives pursuant to section 4503.702 of the Revised Code to the 491
Ohio Association of the Improved Benevolent and Protective Order 492
of the Elks of the World, which shall use the funds for 493
charitable purposes. 494
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 495
receives pursuant to section 4503.703 of the Revised Code to the 496
Ohio state moose association. 497
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 498
receives pursuant to section 4503.704 of the Revised Code to the 499
Antioch shrine foundation located in the municipal corporation 500
of Dayton. 501
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 502
receives pursuant to section 4503.71 of the Revised Code to the 503
fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall 504
deposit the fees into its general account to be used for 505
purposes of the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated. 506
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 507
receives pursuant to section 4503.711 of the Revised Code to the 508
fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall 509
deposit the contributions into an account that it creates to be 510
used for the purpose of advancing and protecting the law 511
enforcement profession, promoting improved law enforcement 512
methods, and teaching respect for law and order. 513
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 514
pursuant to section 4503.712 of the Revised Code to Ohio 515
concerns of police survivors, which shall use those 516
contributions to provide whatever assistance may be appropriate 517

H. B. No. 310 Page 19
As Introduced
to the families of Ohio law enforcement officers who are killed 518
in the line of duty. 519
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 520
pursuant to section 4503.713 of the Revised Code to the greater 521
Cleveland peace officers memorial society, which shall use those 522
contributions to honor law enforcement officers who have died in 523
the line of duty and support its charitable purposes. 524
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 525
pursuant to section 4503.714 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 526
association of chiefs of police. 527
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 528
receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.715 of the 529
Revised Code to the community foundation of Ohio's electric 530
cooperatives, which shall use the contributions to recognize and 531
memorialize fallen or injured lineworkers and support their 532
families. 533
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 534
receives pursuant to section 4503.716 of the Revised Code to the 535
fallen timbers battlefield preservation commission, which shall 536
use the contributions to further the mission of the commission. 537
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 538
receives pursuant to section 4503.72 of the Revised Code to the 539
organization known on March 31, 2003, as the Ohio CASA/GAL 540
association, a private, nonprofit corporation organized under 541
Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code. The Ohio CASA/GAL association 542
shall use these contributions to pay the expenses it incurs in 543
administering a program to secure the proper representation in 544
the courts of this state of abused, neglected, and dependent 545
children, and for the training and supervision of persons 546

H. B. No. 310 Page 20
As Introduced
participating in that program. 547
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 548
receives pursuant to section 4503.722 of the Revised Code to the 549
Down Syndrome Association of Central Ohio, which shall use the 550
contributions for advocacy purposes throughout the state. 551
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 552
receives pursuant to section 4503.724 of the Revised Code to the 553
Ohio Chapter of the American Foundation for Suicide Prevention, 554
which shall use the contributions for programs, education, and 555
advocacy purposes throughout the state. 556
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 557
receives pursuant to section 4503.726 of the Revised Code to the 558
Ohio suicide prevention foundation, which shall use the 559
contributions for suicide prevention programs, education, and 560
advocacy. 561
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 562
receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.725 of the 563
Revised Code to the ALS united Ohio, incorporated, which shall 564
split the contributions between that organization and the ALS 565
association in accordance with any agreement between the two 566
organizations. The contributions shall be used to discover 567
treatments and a cure for ALS, and to serve, advocate for, and 568
empower people affected by ALS to live their lives to the 569
fullest. 570
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 571
receives pursuant to section 4503.73 of the Revised Code to 572
Wright B. Flyer, incorporated, which shall deposit the 573
contributions into its general account to be used for purposes 574
of Wright B. Flyer, incorporated. 575

H. B. No. 310 Page 21
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 576
receives pursuant to section 4503.732 of the Revised Code to the 577
Siegel Shuster society, a nonprofit organization dedicated to 578
commemorating and celebrating the creation of Superman in 579
Cleveland, Ohio. 580
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 581
receives pursuant to section 4503.733 of the Revised Code to the 582
central Ohio chapter of the juvenile diabetes research 583
foundation, which shall distribute the contributions to the 584
chapters of the juvenile diabetes research foundation in whose 585
geographic territory the person who paid the contribution 586
resides. 587
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 588
receives pursuant to section 4503.734 of the Revised Code to the 589
Ohio highway patrol auxiliary foundation, which shall use the 590
contributions to fulfill the foundation's mission of supporting 591
law enforcement education and assistance. 592
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 593
receives pursuant to section 4503.735 of the Revised Code to the 594
heart4seniors/healthcare evolution alert response technology 595
foundation, inc., which shall use the contributions for purposes 596
of the foundation's mission. 597
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 598
receives pursuant to section 4503.74 of the Revised Code to the 599
Columbus zoological park association, which shall disburse the 600
moneys to Ohio's major metropolitan zoos, as defined in section 601
4503.74 of the Revised Code, in accordance with a written 602
agreement entered into by the major metropolitan zoos. 603
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 604

H. B. No. 310 Page 22
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.741 of the Revised Code to the 605
Ohio house rabbit rescue, which shall use the contributions for 606
its rescue, adoption, and educational programs. 607
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 608
receives pursuant to section 4503.75 of the Revised Code to the 609
rotary foundation, located on March 31, 2003, in Evanston, 610
Illinois, to be placed in a fund known as the permanent fund and 611
used to endow educational and humanitarian programs of the 612
rotary foundation. 613
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 614
receives pursuant to section 4503.751 of the Revised Code to the 615
Ohio association of realtors, which shall deposit the 616
contributions into a property disaster relief fund maintained 617
under the Ohio realtors charitable and education foundation. 618
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 619
receives pursuant to section 4503.752 of the Revised Code to 620
buckeye corvettes, incorporated, which shall use the 621
contributions to pay for its charitable activities and programs. 622
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 623
receives pursuant to section 4503.754 of the Revised Code to the 624
municipal corporation of Twinsburg. 625
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 626
receives pursuant to section 4503.755 of the Revised Code to the 627
little brown jug society to assist the society in maintaining, 628
promulgating, and operating the little brown jug as part of 629
Ohio's rich harness racing history. 630
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 631
receives pursuant to section 4503.763 of the Revised Code to the 632
Ohio history connection to be used solely to build, support, and 633

H. B. No. 310 Page 23
As Introduced
maintain the Ohio battleflag collection within the Ohio history 634
connection. 635
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 636
receives pursuant to section 4503.764 of the Revised Code to the 637
Medina county historical society, which shall use those 638
contributions to distribute between the various historical 639
societies and museums in Medina county. 640
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 641
receives pursuant to section 4503.765 of the Revised Code to the 642
Amaranth grand chapter foundation, which shall use the 643
contributions for communal outreach, charitable service, and 644
scholarship purposes. 645
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 646
receives pursuant to section 4503.766 of the Revised Code to the 647
Ohio society daughters of the American revolution, which shall 648
deposit the contributions into its general account to be used 649
for continuing the organization's endeavors in service, historic 650
preservation, education, and patriotism. 651
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 652
receives pursuant to section 4503.767 of the Revised Code to 653
folds of honor of central Ohio, which shall use the 654
contributions to provide scholarships to spouses and children 655
either of disabled veterans or of members of any branch of the 656
armed forces who died during their service. 657
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 658
receives pursuant to section 4503.85 of the Revised Code to the 659
Ohio sea grant college program to be used for Lake Erie area 660
research projects. 661
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 662

H. B. No. 310 Page 24
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.851 of the Revised Code to 663
West Virginia university in Morgantown, West Virginia for 664
purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio 665
who attend the university. The university shall not use any of 666
the funds it receives for purposes of administering the 667
scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate 668
agreements with West Virginia university to effectuate the 669
distribution of such funds as provided in this section. 670
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 671
receives pursuant to section 4503.86 of the Revised Code to the 672
Ohio Lincoln highway historic byway, which shall use those 673
contributions solely to promote and support the historical 674
preservation and advertisement of the Lincoln highway in this 675
state. 676
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 677
receives pursuant to section 4503.87 of the Revised Code to the 678
Grove City little league dream field fund, which shall use those 679
contributions solely to build, maintain, and improve youth 680
baseball fields within the municipal corporation of Grove City. 681
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 682
receives pursuant to section 4503.871 of the Revised Code to the 683
Solon city school district. The school district shall use the 684
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 685
providing services to the school district's students that assist 686
in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being 687
of the students. The services provided may include bereavement 688
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 689
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 690
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 691
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district 692

H. B. No. 310 Page 25
As Introduced
superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's 693
discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate 694
school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations 695
that the school district hires to provide those services. The 696
school district also may use the contributions it receives to 697
pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive 698
training in providing such services to the students of the 699
school district. The school district shall ensure that any 700
charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt 701
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the 702
Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the 703
contributions it receives for any other purpose. 704
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 705
receives pursuant to section 4503.872 of the Revised Code to the 706
Canton city school district. The district may use the 707
contributions for student welfare, but shall not use the 708
contributions for any political purpose or to pay salaries of 709
district employees. 710
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 711
receives pursuant to section 4503.873 of the Revised Code to 712
Padua Franciscan high school located in the municipal 713
corporation of Parma. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 714
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 715
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 716
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 717
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 718
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 719
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 720
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 721
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 722
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 723

H. B. No. 310 Page 26
As Introduced
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 724
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 725
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 726
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 727
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 728
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 729
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 730
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 731
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 732
purpose. 733
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 734
receives pursuant to section 4503.874 of the Revised Code to St. 735
Edward high school located in the municipal corporation of 736
Lakewood. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 737
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 738
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 739
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 740
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 741
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 742
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 743
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 744
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 745
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 746
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 747
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 748
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 749
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 750
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 751
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 752
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 753
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 754

H. B. No. 310 Page 27
As Introduced
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 755
purpose. 756
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 757
receives pursuant to section 4503.875 of the Revised Code to 758
Walsh Jesuit high school located in the municipal corporation of 759
Cuyahoga Falls. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 760
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 761
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 762
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 763
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 764
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 765
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 766
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 767
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 768
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 769
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 770
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 771
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 772
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 773
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 774
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 775
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 776
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 777
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 778
purpose. 779
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 780
receives pursuant to section 4503.876 of the Revised Code to the 781
North Royalton city school district. The school district shall 782
use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs 783
in providing services to the school district's students that 784
assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional 785

H. B. No. 310 Page 28
As Introduced
well-being of the students. The services provided may include 786
bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 787
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 788
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 789
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 790
district superintendent or, in the school district 791
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 792
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 793
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 794
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 795
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 796
district to receive training in providing such services to the 797
students of the school district. The school district shall 798
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 799
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 800
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 801
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 802
purpose. 803
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 804
receives pursuant to section 4503.877 of the Revised Code to the 805
Independence local school district. The school district shall 806
use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs 807
in providing services to the school district's students that 808
assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional 809
well-being of the students. The services provided may include 810
bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 811
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 812
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 813
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 814
district superintendent or, in the school district 815
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 816

H. B. No. 310 Page 29
As Introduced
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 817
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 818
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 819
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 820
district to receive training in providing such services to the 821
students of the school district. The school district shall 822
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 823
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 824
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 825
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 826
purpose. 827
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 828
receives pursuant to section 4503.878 of the Revised Code to the 829
Cuyahoga Heights local school district. The school district 830
shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it 831
incurs in providing services to the school district's students 832
that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 833
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 834
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 835
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 836
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 837
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 838
district superintendent or, in the school district 839
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 840
appropriate school counselors, shall determine any charitable 841
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 842
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 843
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 844
district to receive training in providing such services to the 845
students of the school district. The school district shall 846
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 847

H. B. No. 310 Page 30
As Introduced
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 848
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 849
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 850
purpose. 851
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 852
receives pursuant to section 4503.879 of the Revised Code to the 853
west technical high school alumni association, which shall use 854
the contributions for activities sponsored by the association. 855
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 856
receives pursuant to section 4503.88 of the Revised Code to the 857
Kenston local school district. The school district shall use the 858
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 859
providing services that assist in developing or maintaining a 860
culture of environmental responsibility and an innovative 861
science, technology, engineering, art, and math (S.T.E.A.M.) 862
curriculum to the school district's students. The school 863
district shall not use the contributions it receives for any 864
other purpose. 865
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 866
receives pursuant to section 4503.881 of the Revised Code to La 867
Salle high school in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. 868
The high school shall not use the contributions it receives for 869
any political purpose. 870
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 871
receives pursuant to section 4503.882 of the Revised Code to St. 872
John's Jesuit high school and academy located in the municipal 873
corporation of Toledo. The school shall use the contributions it 874
receives to provide tuition assistance for students attending 875
the school. 876

H. B. No. 310 Page 31
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 877
receives pursuant to section 4503.883 of the Revised Code to St. 878
Charles preparatory school located in the municipal corporation 879
of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's 880
alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. 881
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 882
receives pursuant to section 4503.884 of the Revised Code to 883
Archbishop Moeller high school located in the municipal 884
corporation of Cincinnati. The high school shall not use the 885
contributions it receives for any political purpose. 886
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 887
receives pursuant to section 4503.885 of the Revised Code to the 888
Revere schools foundation. The foundation shall use the 889
contributions to promote its mission, including awarding 890
scholarships to honor young people who are meaningfully engaged 891
in their school or community. The foundation shall not use the 892
contributions for any political purpose. 893
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 894
receives pursuant to section 4503.886 of the Revised Code to 895
Stephen T. Badin high school in the municipal corporation of 896
Hamilton. 897
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 898
receives pursuant to section 4503.887 of the Revised Code to 899
Bishop Hartley high school located in the municipal corporation 900
of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's 901
alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. 902
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 903
receives pursuant to section 4503.888 of the Revised Code to St. 904
Vincent-St. Mary high school located in the municipal 905

H. B. No. 310 Page 32
As Introduced
corporation of Akron. 906
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 907
receives pursuant to section 4503.889 of the Revised Code to the 908
Ironton city school district. The school district shall 909
distribute the contributions on an annual basis as follows: 910
thirty-five per cent to provide a one-time scholarship to the 911
graduating senior from Ironton high school with the highest 912
grade point average; thirty-five per cent to provide a one-time 913
scholarship to the graduating senior from Ironton high school 914
with the second highest grade point average; and thirty per cent 915
to the Ironton city schools athletic department, which shall use 916
the contributions for non-salary purposes. If there is a tie for 917
the graduating senior from Ironton high school with the highest 918
grade point average, the school district shall distribute 919
seventy per cent of the contributions to provide a one-time 920
scholarship divided among all graduating seniors from Ironton 921
high school with that grade point average and thirty per cent of 922
the contributions to the Ironton city schools athletic 923
department as specified above. If there is a tie for the 924
graduating senior from Ironton high school with the second 925
highest grade point average, the school district shall 926
distribute thirty-five per cent of the contributions to provide 927
a one-time scholarship to the graduating senior from Ironton 928
high school with the highest grade point average, thirty-five 929
percent per cent of the contributions to provide a one-time 930
scholarship divided among all graduating seniors from Ironton 931
high school with the second highest grade point average, and 932
thirty per cent of the contributions to the Ironton city schools 933
athletic department as specified above. All scholarships shall 934
be made payable to the educational institution that the 935
applicable student will be attending. 936

H. B. No. 310 Page 33
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 937
receives pursuant to section 4503.89 of the Revised Code to the 938
American red cross of greater Columbus on behalf of the Ohio 939
chapters of the American red cross, which shall use the 940
contributions for disaster readiness, preparedness, and response 941
programs on a statewide basis. 942
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 943
receives pursuant to section 4503.891 of the Revised Code to the 944
Ohio lions foundation. The foundation shall use the 945
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 946
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 947
receives pursuant to section 4503.892 of the Revised Code to the 948
Hudson city school district. The school district shall not use 949
the contributions it receives for any political purpose. 950
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 951
receives pursuant to section 4503.893 of the Revised Code to the 952
Harrison Central jr./sr. high school located in the municipal 953
corporation of Cadiz. 954
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 955
receives pursuant to section 4503.894 of the Revised Code to the 956
Blanchester schools foundation for funding student scholarships 957
and for funding activities and programs for at-risk students. 958
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 959
receives pursuant to section 4503.895 of the Revised Code to the 960
Lakeside Chautauqua foundation. The foundation shall use the 961
contributions it receives for conservation and preservation of 962
Lake Erie and the surrounding ecosystem. 963
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 964
receives pursuant to section 4503.896 of the Revised Code to the 965

H. B. No. 310 Page 34
As Introduced
American legion auxiliary department of Ohio. The auxiliary 966
department shall use the contributions it receives to support 967
the American legion, current and former military members, and 968
their families. 969
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 970
receives pursuant to section 4503.899 of the Revised Code to the 971
Cleveland clinic foundation, which shall use the contributions 972
to support Cleveland clinic children's education, research, and 973
patient services. 974
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 975
receives pursuant to section 4503.90 of the Revised Code to the 976
nationwide children's hospital foundation. 977
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 978
receives pursuant to section 4503.901 of the Revised Code to the 979
Ohio association for pupil transportation, which shall use the 980
money to support transportation programs, provide training to 981
school transportation professionals, and support other 982
initiatives for school transportation safety. 983
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 984
receives pursuant to section 4503.902 of the Revised Code to St. 985
Ignatius high school located in the municipal corporation of 986
Cleveland. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 987
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 988
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 989
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 990
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 991
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 992
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 993
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 994
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 995

H. B. No. 310 Page 35
As Introduced
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 996
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 997
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 998
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 999
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1000
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1001
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1002
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1003
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1004
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1005
purpose. 1006
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1007
receives pursuant to section 4503.903 of the Revised Code to the 1008
Brecksville-Broadview Heights city school district. The school 1009
district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the 1010
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school 1011
district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the 1012
mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services 1013
provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in 1014
defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the 1015
counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating 1016
violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. 1017
The school district superintendent or, in the school district 1018
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 1019
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 1020
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 1021
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 1022
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 1023
district to receive training in providing such services to the 1024
students of the school district. The school district shall 1025
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 1026

H. B. No. 310 Page 36
As Introduced
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 1027
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 1028
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1029
purpose. 1030
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1031
receives pursuant to section 4503.904 of the Revised Code to the 1032
Chagrin Falls exempted village school district. The school 1033
district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the 1034
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school 1035
district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the 1036
mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services 1037
provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in 1038
defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the 1039
counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating 1040
violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. 1041
The school district superintendent or, in the school district 1042
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 1043
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 1044
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 1045
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 1046
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 1047
district to receive training in providing such services to the 1048
students of the school district. The school district shall 1049
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 1050
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 1051
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 1052
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1053
purpose. 1054
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1055
receives pursuant to section 4503.905 of the Revised Code to the 1056
Cuyahoga valley career center. The career center shall use the 1057

H. B. No. 310 Page 37
As Introduced
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 1058
providing services to the career center's students that assist 1059
in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being 1060
of the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1061
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1062
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1063
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1064
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The career center's 1065
superintendent or in the career center's superintendent's 1066
discretion, the school board or appropriate school counselors 1067
shall determine any charitable organizations that the career 1068
center hires to provide those services. The career center also 1069
may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the 1070
faculty of the career center to receive training in providing 1071
such services to the students of the career center. The career 1072
center shall ensure that any charitable organization that is 1073
hired by the career center is exempt from federal income 1074
taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 1075
Code. The career center shall not use the contributions it 1076
receives for any other purpose. 1077
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1078
receives pursuant to section 4503.906 of the Revised Code to the 1079
Stow-Munroe Falls city school district. The school district 1080
shall not use the contributions it receives for any political 1081
purpose. 1082
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1083
receives pursuant to section 4503.907 of the Revised Code to the 1084
Twinsburg city school district. The school district shall not 1085
use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. 1086
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1087

H. B. No. 310 Page 38
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.908 of the Revised Code to St. 1088
Xavier high school located in Springfield township in Hamilton 1089
county. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions 1090
it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The 1091
school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the 1092
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 1093
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 1094
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 1095
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 1096
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 1097
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 1098
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1099
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1100
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1101
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1102
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1103
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1104
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1105
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1106
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1107
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1108
purpose. 1109
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1110
receives pursuant to section 4503.909 of the Revised Code to the 1111
Grandview Heights city school district, which shall use the 1112
contributions for its gifted programs and special education and 1113
related services. 1114
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1115
pursuant to section 4503.92 of the Revised Code to support our 1116
troops, incorporated, a national nonprofit corporation, which 1117
shall use those contributions in accordance with its articles of 1118

H. B. No. 310 Page 39
As Introduced
incorporation and for the benefit of servicemembers of the armed 1119
forces of the United States and their families when they are in 1120
financial need. 1121
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1122
pursuant to section 4503.931 of the Revised Code to healthy New 1123
Albany, which shall use the contributions for its community 1124
programs, events, and other activities. 1125
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1126
receives pursuant to section 4503.932 of the Revised Code to 1127
habitat for humanity of Ohio, inc., which shall use the 1128
contributions for its projects related to building affordable 1129
houses. 1130
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1131
receives pursuant to section 4503.933 of the Revised Code to 1132
Ohio citizens for the arts foundation, which shall use the 1133
contributions for advocacy, education, and professional 1134
development programs. 1135
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1136
receives pursuant to section 4503.934 of the Revised Code to 1137
Ohio society for respiratory care of the American association 1138
for respiratory care, incorporated, which shall use the 1139
contributions to benefit the Ohio society for respiratory care 1140
student scholarship fund. 1141
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1142
receives pursuant to section 4503.935 of the Revised Code to 1143
Jesup W. Scott high school's principal activities fund. The high 1144
school shall use the contributions to enhance learning 1145
opportunities for the high school's students. 1146
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1147

H. B. No. 310 Page 40
As Introduced
receives pursuant to section 4503.936 of the Revised Code to the 1148
Hilliard Davidson baseball club, which shall use the 1149
contributions to support the team. 1150
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1151
receives pursuant to section 4503.94 of the Revised Code to the 1152
Michelle's leading star foundation, which shall use the money 1153
solely to fund the rental, lease, or purchase of the simulated 1154
driving curriculum of the Michelle's leading star foundation by 1155
boards of education of city, exempted village, local, and joint 1156
vocational school districts. 1157
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1158
receives pursuant to section 4503.941 of the Revised Code to the 1159
Ohio chapter international society of arboriculture, which shall 1160
use the money to increase consumer awareness on the importance 1161
of proper tree care and to raise funds for the chapter's 1162
educational efforts. 1163
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1164
pursuant to section 4503.942 of the Revised Code to zero, the 1165
end of prostate cancer, incorporated, a nonprofit organization, 1166
which shall use those contributions to raise awareness of 1167
prostate cancer, to support research to end prostate cancer, and 1168
to support prostate cancer patients and their families. 1169
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1170
receives pursuant to section 4503.943 of the Revised Code to the 1171
nonprofit organization weirdo cat lovers of Cleveland, which 1172
shall use the contributions to further its mission of assisting 1173
pet parents with emergency veterinary bills for their feline 1174
companions, providing food and litter to those in economic need, 1175
and controlling feral cat populations through the process of 1176
trap-neuter-return to the community. 1177

H. B. No. 310 Page 41
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1178
receives pursuant to section 4503.944 of the Revised Code to the 1179
eastern European congress of Ohio, which shall use the 1180
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 1181
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1182
receives pursuant to section 4503.945 of the Revised Code to the 1183
Summit metro parks foundation, which shall use the money in 1184
support of the Summit county metro parks. 1185
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1186
receives pursuant to section 4503.946 of the Revised Code to the 1187
Ohio society, sons of the American revolution, which shall use 1188
the contributions for special projects related to historical 1189
education. 1190
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1191
receives pursuant to section 4503.951 of the Revised Code to the 1192
Cincinnati city school district. 1193
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1194
receives pursuant to section 4503.952 of the Revised Code to 1195
Hawken school located in northeast Ohio. The school shall use 1196
fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide 1197
tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the 1198
remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in 1199
providing services to the school's students that assist in 1200
developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of 1201
the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1202
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1203
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1204
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1205
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1206
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1207

H. B. No. 310 Page 42
As Introduced
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1208
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1209
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1210
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1211
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1212
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1213
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1214
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1215
purpose. 1216
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1217
receives pursuant to section 4503.953 of the Revised Code to 1218
Gilmour academy located in the municipal corporation of Gates 1219
Mills. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions 1220
it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The 1221
school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the 1222
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 1223
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 1224
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 1225
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 1226
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 1227
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 1228
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1229
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1230
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1231
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1232
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1233
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1234
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1235
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1236
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1237
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1238

H. B. No. 310 Page 43
As Introduced
purpose. 1239
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1240
receives pursuant to section 4503.954 of the Revised Code to 1241
University school located in the suburban area near the 1242
municipal corporation of Cleveland. The school shall use fifty 1243
per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition 1244
assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining 1245
fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing 1246
services to the school's students that assist in developing or 1247
maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. 1248
The services provided may include bereavement counseling, 1249
instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity 1250
training, and the counseling and education of students regarding 1251
bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and 1252
human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the 1253
school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to 1254
receive training in providing those services. The school 1255
principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate 1256
school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations 1257
that the school hires to provide those services. The school 1258
shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt 1259
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the 1260
Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the 1261
contributions it receives for any other purpose. 1262
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1263
receives pursuant to section 4503.955 of the Revised Code to 1264
Saint Albert the Great school located in North Royalton. The 1265
school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives 1266
to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall 1267
use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs 1268
in providing services to the school's students that assist in 1269

H. B. No. 310 Page 44
As Introduced
developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of 1270
the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1271
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1272
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1273
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1274
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1275
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1276
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1277
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1278
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1279
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1280
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1281
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1282
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1283
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1284
purpose. 1285
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1286
receives pursuant to section 4503.956 of the Revised Code to the 1287
Liberty Center local school district, which shall use the 1288
contributions for its gifted programs and special education and 1289
related services. 1290
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1291
receives pursuant to section 4503.957 of the Revised Code to 1292
John F. Kennedy Catholic school located in Warren. The school 1293
shall not use the contributions it receives for any political 1294
purpose. 1295
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1296
receives pursuant to section 4503.958 of the Revised Code to 1297
Elder high school located in the municipal corporation of 1298
Cincinnati. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 1299

H. B. No. 310 Page 45
As Introduced
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 1300
students, twenty-five per cent of the contributions to benefit 1301
arts and enrichment at the school, and twenty-five per cent of 1302
the contributions to benefit athletics at the school. 1303
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1304
receives pursuant to section 4503.959 of the Revised Code to the 1305
Dublin food pantry, which shall use the contributions to provide 1306
food, hygiene products, and other resources to individuals and 1307
families experiencing food insecurity. 1308
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1309
receives pursuant to section 4503.961 of the Revised Code to 1310
Fairfield senior high school located in the municipal 1311
corporation of Fairfield. The high school shall not use the 1312
contributions for any political purpose. 1313
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1314
receives pursuant to section 4503.962 of the Revised Code to 1315
Hamilton high school located in the municipal corporation of 1316
Hamilton. The high school shall not use the contributions for 1317
any political purpose. 1318
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1319
receives pursuant to section 4503.963 of the Revised Code to 1320
Ross high school located in Ross township in Butler county. The 1321
high school shall not use the contributions for any political 1322
purpose. 1323
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1324
receives pursuant to section 4503.964 of the Revised Code to 1325
Chardon hilltopper gridiron club. The club shall use 1326
contributions to fund college and career technical training 1327
scholarships for students. 1328

H. B. No. 310 Page 46
As Introduced
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1329
receives pursuant to section 4503.965 of the Revised Code to the 1330
Norton music boosters association. The association shall use the 1331
contributions to provide financial assistance to the Norton high 1332
school music boosters for equipment, travel, and programming 1333
expenses. 1334
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1335
receives pursuant to section 4503.97 of the Revised Code to the 1336
friends of united Hatzalah of Israel, which shall use the money 1337
to support united Hatzalah of Israel, which provides free 1338
emergency medical first response throughout Israel. 1339
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1340
receives pursuant to section 4503.98 of the Revised Code to the 1341
Westerville parks foundation to support the programs and 1342
activities of the foundation and its mission of pursuing the 1343
city of Westerville's vision of becoming "A City Within A Park." 1344
(C) All investment earnings of the license plate 1345
contribution fund shall be credited to the fund. Not later than 1346
the first day of May of every year, the registrar shall 1347
distribute to each entity described in division (B) of this 1348
section the investment income the fund earned the previous 1349
calendar year. The amount of such a distribution paid to an 1350
entity shall be proportionate to the amount of money the entity 1351
received from the fund during the previous calendar year. 1352
Sec. 4503.889. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger 1353
car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other 1354
vehicle of a class approved by the registrar of motor vehicles 1355
may apply to the registrar for the registration of the vehicle 1356
and issuance of "Ironton Fighting Tigers" license plates. The 1357
application may be combined with a request for a special 1358

H. B. No. 310 Page 47
As Introduced
reserved license plate under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the 1359
Revised Code. Upon receipt of the completed application and 1360
compliance by the applicant with divisions (B) and (C) of this 1361
section, the registrar shall issue to the applicant the 1362
appropriate vehicle registration and a set of "Ironton Fighting 1363
Tigers" license plates and a validation sticker, or a validation 1364
sticker alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised 1365
Code. 1366
In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily 1367
inscribed on the license plates, "Ironton Fighting Tigers" 1368
license plates shall display an appropriate logo and words that 1369
are selected by representatives of the Ironton city school 1370
district and approved by the registrar. "Ironton Fighting 1371
Tigers" license plates shall display county identification 1372
stickers that identify the county of registration as required 1373
under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. 1374
(B) "Ironton Fighting Tigers" license plates and a 1375
validation sticker, or validation sticker alone, shall be issued 1376
upon receipt of an application for registration of a motor 1377
vehicle under this section; payment of the regular license tax 1378
as prescribed under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any 1379
applicable motor vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. 1380
of the Revised Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by 1381
section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, an additional 1382
administrative fee of ten dollars, and a contribution as 1383
provided in division (C)(1) of this section; and compliance with 1384
all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor 1385
vehicles. 1386
(C)(1) For each application for registration and 1387
registration renewal notice the registrar receives under this 1388

H. B. No. 310 Page 48
As Introduced
section, the registrar shall collect a contribution of thirty 1389
dollars. The registrar shall deposit this contribution into the 1390
state treasury to the credit of the license plate contribution 1391
fund created in section 4501.21 of the Revised Code. 1392
(2) The registrar shall deposit the administrative fee of 1393
ten dollars, the purpose of which is to compensate the bureau of 1394
motor vehicles for additional services required in the issuing 1395
of "Ironton Fighting Tigers" license plates, into the state 1396
treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes 1397
fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. 1398
Section 2. That existing section 4501.21 of the Revised 1399
Code is hereby repealed. 1400
Section 3. Section 4501.21 of the Revised Code is 1401
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 1402
by both H.B. 315 and S.B. 163 of the 135th General Assembly. The 1403
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 1404
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 1405
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 1406
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 1407
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 1408
presented in this act. 1409